Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.050

Action on irrigation or drainage district warrant.

Action to enforce any right arising out of the issuance or ownership of any warrant of an irrigation or drainage district organized under the laws of this state, must be brought within six years from and after the date of the issuance of such warrant.

[ 1931 c 75 s 1; RRS s 157-1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: Transitional proviso omitted. The proviso reads: "PROVIDED, That this section shall not apply to actions not otherwise barred on warrants heretofore issued, if the same shall be commenced within one year after the taking effect of this act".